test/src/morphology/N-aki_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - аки: # Noun 122 'eng paternal uncle/est kahju/fin setä' - full paradigm
     аки+N+Sg+Nom: аки
     аки+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: аким
     аки+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: акин
     аки+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: акитэ
     аки+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: акиме̄н
     аки+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: акӣн
     аки+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: акитэ̄н
     аки+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: акиюв
     аки+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: акин
     аки+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: акияныл
     аки+N+Du+Nom: акийыг
     аки+N+Pl+Nom: акит
#
     а̄ны+N+Sg+Nom: а̄ны
     а̄ны+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: а̄ным
     а̄ны+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: а̄нын
     а̄ны+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: а̄нытэ
     а̄ны+N+Du+Nom: а̄ныйыг
     а̄ны+N+Pl+Nom: а̄ныт
